Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 2. Public Employees’ Defined Benefit Retirement Plan.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 4, ch. 52, SLA 2014 requires the Alaska Retirement Management Board to “reinitialize the amortization of the past service liability” of the defined benefit retirement plan under this article “for a term beginning July 1, 2014, and ending June 30, 2039”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 13, SLA 2008 (SB 125) proposing changes to the defined benefit plan of the Public Employees’ Retirement System to make it into an employer cost-sharing program, see 2007 Senate Journal 570 — 572.

Sec. 39.35.095.
Applicability of AS 39.35.095 — 39.35.680.

The following provisions of this chapter apply only to members first hired before July 1, 2006: AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

.

History.

(§ 83 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 39.35.100.
Accounting.

The commissioner shall establish and maintain an adequate system of accounts and records for the plan. The accounts and records shall be integrated with the accounts, records, and procedures of the employers to the end that they operate most effectively and at minimum expense, and that duplication of records and accounts is avoided.

An individual account shall be maintained for each employee to record the amount of the employee’s mandatory contributions collected under AS

39.35.160(a)

. As of the last day of each calendar year and of each fiscal year, this account shall be credited with interest by applying the prescribed rate of interest, as determined by the board, to the balance in the account as of that date. When the employee is appointed to retirement, the amount held in the individual account shall be used first to fully finance the benefits paid. Once this account has been exhausted, the plan shall fully finance the benefits paid that were not financed by the employee’s individual account.

An individual account shall be maintained for each employee to record the amount of the employee’s voluntary contributions to an employee savings account under AS

39.35.180

. As of the last day of each calendar year and of each fiscal year, this account shall be credited with interest by applying the prescribed rate of interest, as determined by the board, to the balance in the account as of that date. Amounts that, before termination of employment, are withdrawn by an employee from the employee’s savings account shall be charged to that account. When an employee is appointed to retirement, the amount held in the employee’s savings account shall be paid in accordance with AS

39.35.395

.

History.

(§ 36 ch 143 SLA 1960; am §§ 1, 2 ch 35 SLA 1969; am §§ 2, 3 ch 109 SLA 1970; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 1 SLA 1974; am § 18 ch 128 SLA 1977; am §§ 42, 43 ch 137 SLA 1982; am § 84 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 8 ch 13 SLA 2008; am §§ 10, 11 ch 35 SLA 2008)

Editor’s notes. —

Under §§ 10 and 11, ch. 35, SLA 2008, from May 23, 2008 until July 1, 2008, former (b) (3) and (4) of this section contained an exception for AS

39.35.255(f)

(which was enacted as AS 39.35.270(d)).

Sec. 39.35.110.
Investments. [Repealed, § 33 ch 141 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 39.35.115.
Defined benefit retirement plan.

A defined benefit retirement plan for employees of the state, political subdivisions, and public organizations is created. The plan becomes effective January 1, 1961, at which time contributions by the employers and members begin.

The retirement plan established by AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

is intended to qualify under 26 U.S.C. 401(a) and 414(d) (Internal Revenue Code) as a qualified retirement plan established and maintained by the state for its employees and for the employees of political subdivisions, public corporations, and public organizations of the state, and for the employees of other employers whose participation is authorized by AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

and who participate in this plan.

An amendment to AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

does not provide a person with a vested right to a benefit if the Internal Revenue Service determines that the amendment will result in disqualification of the plan under the Internal Revenue Code.

The retirement plan established by AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

is a joint contributory plan.

If, upon termination of the plan, all liabilities are satisfied, any excess assets shall be deposited in the general fund, subject to the approval of the termination by the Internal Revenue Service.

History.

(§ 85 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am § 58 ch 20 SLA 2007; am § 3 ch 52 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective June 24, 2014, in (e), substituted “be deposited in the general fund” for “revert to the employers as determined by the administrator”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 20, SLA 2007 (SB 123), proposing needed corrections and clarifications of statutes enacted as part of the 2005 legislation establishing defined contributions retirement plans and making related amendments to defined benefit retirement plans, see 2007 Senate Journal 567 — 570.